Georgia statutes. TITLE 5 Appeal And Error
Article 2 Procedure

5-3-20.
Time for filing appeals.

Appeals to the superior court shall be filed within 30 days of the date the judgment, order, or decision complained of was entered.

The date of entry of an order, judgment, or other decision shall be the date upon which it was filed in the court, agency, or other tribunal rendering same, duly signed by the judge or other official thereof.

This Code section shall apply to all appeals to the superior court, any other law to the contrary notwithstanding.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3533; Code 1868, § 3556; Code 1873, § 3613; Code 1882, § 3613; Civil Code 1895, § 4455; Civil Code 1910, § 5000; Code 1933, § 6-102; Ga. L. 1972, p. 738, § 1.

History of Code section. —

This Code section is derived from the decision in State v. Dean,

9 Ga. 405

(1851).

Law reviews.

For annual survey on zoning and land use law, see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 371 (2017).

For annual survey on zoning and land use law, see 70 Mercer L. Rev. 301 (2018).

5-3-21.
Notice of appeal; form; service.

An appeal to the superior court may be taken by filing a notice of appeal with the court, agency, or other tribunal appealed from. No particular form shall be necessary for the notice of appeal, but the following is suggested:

A copy of the notice of appeal shall be served on all parties in the same manner prescribed by Code Section 5-6-32. Failure to perfect service on any party shall not work dismissal, but the superior court shall grant continuances and enter such other orders as may be necessary to permit a just and expeditious determination of the appeal.

(NAME OF INFERIOR JUDICATORY) STATE OF GEORGIA ) ) v. ) (Case number ) designation) ) ) APPEAL TO SUPERIOR COURT Notice is hereby given that , appellant herein, and , above-named, hereby appeals to the Superior (plaintiff, defendant, etc.) Court of County from the judgment (or order, decision, etc.) entered herein on , .
(date)
Dated: . Attorney For Appellant Address

Click to view

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3534; Code 1868, § 3557; Ga. L. 1868, p. 131, § 2; Code 1873, § 3614; Code 1882, § 3614; Civil Code 1895, § 4456; Civil Code 1910, § 5001; Code 1933, § 6-103; Ga. L. 1972, p. 738, § 3; Ga. L. 1999, p. 81, § 5.

5-3-22.
Payment of costs prerequisite to appeal; affidavit of indigence; dismissal for nonpayment following court order; supersedeas bond.

No appeal shall be heard in the superior or state court until any costs which have accrued in the court, agency, or tribunal below have been paid unless the appellant files with the superior or state court or with the court, agency, or tribunal appealed from an affidavit stating that because of indigence he or she is unable to pay the costs on appeal. In all cases, no appeal shall be dismissed in the superior or state court because of nonpayment of the costs below until the appellant has been directed by the court to do so and has failed to comply with the court’s direction.

Filing of the notice of appeal and payment of costs or filing of an affidavit as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section shall act as supersedeas, and it shall not be necessary that a supersedeas bond be filed; provided, however, that the superior or state court upon motion may at any time require that supersedeas bond with good security be given in such amount as the court may deem necessary unless the appellant files with the court an affidavit stating that because of indigence he or she is unable to give bond.

History.

Laws 1799, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 494; Code 1863, § 3536; Code 1868, § 3559; Code 1873, § 3616; Code 1882, § 3616; Civil Code 1895, § 4458; Civil Code 1910, § 5003; Code 1933, § 6-105; Ga. L. 1972, p. 738, § 4; Ga. L. 1995, p. 10, § 5; Ga. L. 2009, p. 647, § 1/HB 324.

5-3-23.
Signature on bond of attorney at law or in fact.

If an appeal is entered by the attorney at law or in fact, he may sign the name of the principal to the appeal bond, if required, and the principal shall be bound thereby as though he had signed it himself.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3537; Code 1868, § 3560; Code 1873, § 3617; Code 1882, § 3617; Civil Code 1895, § 4459; Civil Code 1910, § 5004; Code 1933, § 6-107.

5-3-24.
Exemption of executors, administrators, and trustees from paying costs and giving bond.

Executors, administrators, and other trustees, when defending an action as such or defending solely the title of the estate, may enter an appeal without paying costs and giving bond and security as required by Code Section 5-3-22; but, if a judgment should be obtained against such executor, administrator, or other trustee and not the assets of the estate, he must pay costs and give security as in other cases.

History.

Laws 1799, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 495; Code 1863, § 3542; Code 1868, § 3565; Code 1873, § 3622; Code 1882, § 3622; Civil Code 1895, § 4464; Civil Code 1910, § 5009; Code 1933, § 6-113.

Editor’s notes.

The operation of this Code section is confined to appeals from courts other than the probate courts. See Hobbs v. Cody,

45 Ga. 478

(1872); Goodwyn v. Veal,

50 Ga. App. 657

,

179 S.E. 126

(1935), and Wever v. Wever,

183 Ga. 453

,

188 S.E. 706

(1936).

5-3-25.
Appeal by partners or joint contractors; signature on bond; appeal by corporation.

When several partners or joint contractors bring or defend an action as such, any one of the partners or joint contractors may enter an appeal in the name of the firm or joint contractors and sign the name of the firm or joint contractors to a bond if required by the superior court, which shall be binding on the firm and the joint contractors as though they had signed it themselves. In the case of corporations, the appeal may be entered by the president or any agent thereof managing the case or by the attorney of record.

History.

Laws 1838, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 589; Code 1863, § 3538; Code 1868, § 3561; Code 1873, § 3618; Code 1882, § 3618; Civil Code 1895, § 4460; Civil Code 1910, § 5005; Code 1933, § 6-108.

5-3-26.
Requirement of written defenses in appeal from justice of the peace court; right to amend pleadings.

Reserved. Repealed by Ga. L. 1983, p. 884, § 4-2, effective July 1, 1983.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was based on Ga. L. 1884-85, p. 97, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 4139; Civil Code 1910, § 4739; Code 1933, § 6-303.

5-3-27.
Amendments to cure defects.

No appeal shall be dismissed because of any defect in the notice of appeal, bond, or affidavit of indigence or because of the failure of the lower court, agency, or other tribunal to transmit the pleadings or other record; but the superior court shall at any time permit such amendments and enter such orders as may be necessary to cure the defect.

History.

Code 1933, § 6-115, enacted by Ga. L. 1972, p. 738, § 5.

5-3-28.
Transmittal of record and transcripts to superior court; issuance of orders and writs.

Within ten days of the filing of the notice of appeal, it shall be the duty of the judge or other official of the court, agency, or tribunal appealed from to cause a true copy of the pleadings, if any, and all other parts of the record (and transcript of evidence and proceedings, where the appeal is not de novo) to be transmitted to the superior court.

The superior court may issue such orders and writs as may be necessary in aid of its jurisdiction on appeal.

History.

Code 1933, § 6-114, enacted by Ga. L. 1972, p. 738, § 5.

Cross references.

Appeals — probate court transcript not transmitted, Uniform Rules for the Probate Courts, Rule 9.3.

5-3-29.
De novo investigation.

An appeal to the superior court in any case where not otherwise provided by law is a de novo investigation. It brings up the whole record from the court below; and all competent evidence shall be admissible on the trial thereof, whether adduced on a former trial or not. Either party is entitled to be heard on the whole merits of the case.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3548; Code 1868, § 3571; Code 1873, § 3627; Code 1882, § 3627; Civil Code 1895, § 4469; Civil Code 1910, § 5014; Code 1933, § 6-501; Ga. L. 1972, p. 738, § 8; Ga. L. 1983, p. 884, § 3-1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 982, § 2.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1986, p. 982, § 25, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that that Act would apply to all cases filed on or after July 1, 1986.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of law of wills, trusts, and administration of estates, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 417 (1986).

5-3-30.
Calendaring appeal; waiver of trial by jury; monetary limitations inapplicable.

Upon the filing of an appeal from magistrate court to superior court or state court, the appeal shall be placed upon the court’s next calendar for nonjury trial. Such appeals from the magistrate court to superior court or state court shall be tried by the superior court or state court without a jury unless either party files a demand for a jury trial within 30 days of the filing of the appeal or the court orders a jury trial.

Upon filing an appeal pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section, the monetary limitations provided for in paragraph (5) of Code Section 15-10-2 shall no longer apply to any verdict and judgment entered by the superior or state court.

History.

Laws 1805, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 183; Laws 1823, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 497; Code 1863, § 3551; Code 1868, § 3574; Code 1873, § 3630; Code 1882, § 3630; Civil Code 1895, § 4472; Civil Code 1910, § 5017; Code 1933, § 6-601; Ga. L. 1988, p. 253, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 552, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1223, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1998, p. 552, § 2, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the 1998 amendment to this Code section is applicable to appeals filed on or after July 1, 1998.

Cross references.

Juries, T. 15, C. 12.

Law reviews.

For article, “Trial Practice and Procedure,” see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 475 (2001).

For survey article on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 60 Mercer L. Rev. 417 (2008).

5-3-31.
Damages assessed for frivolous appeals.

If upon the trial of any appeal it shall appear to the jury that the appeal was frivolous and intended for delay only, they shall assess damages against the appellant and his security, if any, in favor of the appellee for such delay, not exceeding 25 percent on the principal sum which they shall find due, which damages shall be specially noted in their verdict.

History.

Laws 1799, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 495; Code 1863, § 3552; Code 1868, § 3575; Ga. L. 1868, p. 132, § 2; Code 1873, § 3631; Code 1882, § 3631; Civil Code 1895, § 4473; Civil Code 1910, § 5018; Code 1933, § 6-602; Ga. L. 1983, p. 884, § 3-2.